Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.40.020

Payment of claims and obligations by warrant or check.

A code city, by ordinance, may adopt a policy for the payment of claims or other obligations of the city, which are payable out of solvent funds, electing either to pay such obligations by warrant, or to pay such obligations by check: PROVIDED, That no check shall be issued when the applicable fund is not solvent at the time payment is ordered, but a warrant shall be issued therefor. When checks are to be used, the legislative body shall designate the qualified public depositary whereon such checks are to be drawn, and the officers authorized or required to sign such checks. Wherever in this title, reference is made to warrants, such term shall include checks where authorized by this section.

[ 1984 c 177 s 5; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.40.020.]